Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6174.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Animal protection shelter" means a facility that is registered licensed with the department under section 6 4 of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.336, 287.334, and is operated by any of the following: (i) A person. (ii) A humane society. (iii) A society for the prevention of cruelty to animals. (iv) Any other nonprofit organization for the care of homeless animals. (b) "Cat" means a domestic cat of any age of the species Felis catus. (c) "Dealer" means a person that for compensation or profit delivers for transportation, transports, boards, buys, or sells dogs or cats for research purposes. Dealer does not include a person that breeds or raises dogs or cats for sale to a research facility. (d) "Department" means the department of agriculture and rural development. (e) "Director" means the director of the department. (f) "Dog" means a domestic dog of any age of the species Canis lupus familiaris. (g) "Laboratory animal" means a dog or cat that is used or intended to be used for laboratory research at a research facility. (h) "Laboratory research" means research, tests, or experiments conducted for education, scientific, medical, or experimental purposes. (i) "Municipality" means a county, city, village, or township. (j) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity. (k) "Research facility" means a school, hospital, laboratory, institution, organization, or person that is licensed or otherwise registered with the United States Department of Agriculture, that uses or intends to use a laboratory animal in laboratory research, and that does 1 or both of the following: (i) Purchases or transports laboratory animals. (ii) Receives funds from this state, a local government, or an agency or instrumentality of this state or a local government to finance its operations through grants, loans, or other funds. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02817'25) or House Bill No. 6167 (request no. H02817'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.